Georgia, session 2025_26, HB308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
21 SECTION 1.
22 Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to motor vehicles and traffic, is
23 amended in Code Section 40-1-1, relating to definitions, by revising paragraph (27.1) and
24 adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
25 "(27.1) 'Miniature on-road vehicle' means any motorized vehicle designed and
26 manufactured for use upon roadways in another country that has been imported into the
27 United States with a valid certificate of title or registration from the exporting country
28 and in compliance with all federal importation requirements and which has the following
29 characteristics:
30 (A) Has the capability to transport persons;
31 (B) Operates between 25 miles per hour (40.2 kilometers per hour) and 65 miles per
32 hour (104.6 kilometers per hour);
33 (C) Has an overall width of 80 inches (2,030 millimeters) or less, exclusive of
34 accessories or attachments;
35 (D) Is designed to travel on four or more wheels;
36 (E) Uses a steering wheel for steering control;
37 (F) Contains a nonstraddle seat;
38 (G) Has a gross vehicle weight rating of less than 4,000 pounds (1,814 kilograms); and
39 (H) Is not designed or manufactured as a golf cart, all-terrain vehicle, or multipurpose
40 off-highway vehicle.
41 (27.2) 'Minimal risk condition' means a low-risk operating mode in which a fully
42 autonomous vehicle operating without a human driver achieves a reasonably safe state,
H. B. 308
- 2 -

25 HB 308/AP
43 such as bringing the vehicle to a complete stop, upon experiencing a failure of the
44 vehicle's automated driving system that renders the vehicle unable to perform the entire
45 dynamic driving task."
46 SECTION 2.
47 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-2-27, relating to registration of motor
48 vehicles not manufactured to comply with federal emission and safety standards, certificate
49 of registration for an assembled motor vehicle or motorcycle or a converted motor vehicle,
50 and former military motor vehicles, by revising subsection (e) as follows:
51 "(e) The provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to applications
52 for certificates of registration for former military motor vehicles that are less than 25 years
53 old and manufactured for the United States military, or multipurpose off-highway vehicles
54 manufactured after January 1, 2000, or miniature on-road vehicles manufactured more than
55 25 years prior to application; provided, however, that the exception provided by this
56 subsection shall be applicable to miniature on-road vehicles manufactured less than 25
57 years prior to application that have been modified by an importer registered with the United
58 States Department of Transportation to comply with applicable federal motor vehicle safety
59 standards issued pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Section 30101, et seq., and certified by such
60 importer as such."
61 SECTION 3.
62 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-2-31, relating to license plate design,
63 retention of manufacturing and delivery costs, revalidation, county, and "In God We Trust"
64 decals, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
65 "(b) License plates issued pursuant to this chapter shall be at least six inches wide and not
66 less than 12 inches in length, except that motorcycle license plates shall be at least four
67 inches wide and not less than seven inches in length and license plates for low-speed
H. B. 308
- 3 -

25 HB 308/AP
68 vehicles, miniature on-road vehicles, and multipurpose off-highway vehicles shall be a size
69 determined by the commissioner. All license plates shall show in boldface characters the
70 month and year of expiration, the serial number, and either the full name or the
71 abbreviation of the name of the state, shall designate the county from which the license
72 plate was issued unless specifically stated otherwise in this chapter, and shall show such
73 other distinctive markings as in the judgment of the commissioner may be deemed
74 advisable, so as to indicate the class of weight of the vehicle for which the license plate was
75 issued. Any license plate for a low-speed vehicle, miniature on-road vehicle, or
76 multipurpose off-highway vehicle shall designate the vehicle as such. Such plates may also
77 bear such figures, characters, letters, or combinations thereof as in the judgment of the
78 commissioner will to the best advantage advertise, popularize, and otherwise promote
79 Georgia as the 'Peach State.' Plates issued during the years 2026 through 2030 shall
80 include the design approved pursuant to Code Section 40-2-31.1. Except for license plates
81 issued pursuant to Article 2B of this chapter, any license plate issued pursuant to this
82 chapter shall be of such strength and quality that the plate shall provide a minimum service
83 period of at least five years. The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant
84 to the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,' for
85 the design and issuance of new license plates and to implement the other provisions of this
86 Code section."
87 SECTION 4.
88 Said title is further amended in said Code section, as in effect on January 1, 2032, by revising
89 subsection (b) as follows:
90 "(b) License plates issued pursuant to this chapter shall be at least six inches wide and not
91 less than 12 inches in length, except that motorcycle license plates shall be at least four
92 inches wide and not less than seven inches in length and license plates for low-speed
93 vehicles, miniature on-road vehicles, and multipurpose off-highway vehicles shall be a size
H. B. 308
- 4 -

25 HB 308/AP
94 determined by the commissioner. All license plates shall show in boldface characters the
95 month and year of expiration, the serial number, and either the full name or the
96 abbreviation of the name of the state, shall designate the county from which the license
97 plate was issued unless specifically stated otherwise in this chapter, and shall show such
98 other distinctive markings as in the judgment of the commissioner may be deemed
99 advisable, so as to indicate the class of weight of the vehicle for which the license plate was
100 issued. Any license plate for a low-speed vehicle, miniature on-road vehicle, or
101 multipurpose off-highway vehicle shall designate the vehicle as such. Such plates may also
102 bear such figures, characters, letters, or combinations thereof as in the judgment of the
103 commissioner will to the best advantage advertise, popularize, and otherwise promote
104 Georgia as the 'Peach State.' Except for license plates issued pursuant to Article 2B of this
105 chapter, any license plate issued pursuant to this chapter shall be of such strength and
106 quality that the plate shall provide a minimum service period of at least five years. The
107 commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 13
108 of Title 50, the 'Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,' for the design and issuance of new
109 license plates and to implement the other provisions of this Code section."
110 SECTION 5.
111 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-2-33, relating to issuance of license plates
112 and decals, transfer of registration to a digital license plate, compensation of tag agents, and
113 required identification, by revising paragraph (2.1) of subsection (a) as follows:
114 "(2.1) The commissioner may provide for the issuance of a temporary operating permit
115 for any multipurpose off-highway miniature on-road vehicle, to be displayed until such
116 time as a license plate of the design required by Code Section 40-2-31 has been issued
117 to the registrant as a replacement for such temporary operating permit; provided,
118 however, that any such temporary operating permit shall designate the multipurpose
119 off-highway miniature on-road vehicle as such; and provided, further, that the
H. B. 308
- 5 -

25 HB 308/AP
120 commissioner shall make available for issuance multipurpose off-highway miniature
121 on-road vehicle license plates of the design required by Code Section 40-2-31 not later
122 than January 1, 2024 2026."
123 SECTION 6.
124 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-2-151, relating to annual license fees for
125 operation of vehicles, fee for permanent licensing of certain trailers, and fee for new
126 passenger car with paid title ad valorem taxes, by revising paragraph (2) of subsection (a) as
127 follows:
128 "(2) For each motorcycle, miniature on-road vehicle, or multipurpose
129 off-highway vehicle . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 20.00"
130 SECTION 7.
131 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-3-30.1, relating to standards for issuance to
132 assembled motor vehicle and motorcycle or converted motor vehicle, inspections,
133 unconventional motor vehicle or motorcycle not to be titled or registered, and exception, by
134 revising subsection (f) as follows:
135 "(f) Unconventional motor vehicles or motorcycles shall not be titled or registered;
136 provided, however, that a multipurpose off-highway vehicle manufactured after January
137 1, 2000, the following unconventional motor vehicles shall be registered upon proper
138 application and payment of the required fee:
139 (1) A multipurpose off-highway vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2000;
140 (2) A miniature on-road vehicle manufactured more than 25 years prior to application;
141 and
142 (3) A miniature on-road vehicle manufactured less than 25 years prior to application that
143 has been modified by an importer registered with the United States Department of
H. B. 308
- 6 -

25 HB 308/AP
144 Transportation to comply with applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards issued
145 pursuant to 49 U.S.C. Section 30101, et seq., and certified by such importer as such."
146 SECTION 8.
147 Said title is further amended by revising Part 5 of Article 13 of Chapter 6, relating to
148 low-speed or multipurpose off-highway vehicles, as follows:
149 "Part 5
150 40-6-359.
151 Multipurpose off-highway vehicles and miniature on-road vehicles shall be equipped with:
152 (1) Headlights;
153 (2) Brake lights;
154 (3) Taillights;
155 (4) A rearview mirror; and
156 (5) Safety belts.
157 40-6-360.
158 Every person operating a low-speed vehicle, miniature on-road vehicle, or multipurpose
159 off-highway vehicle shall be granted all the rights and shall be subject to all the duties
160 applicable to the driver of any other vehicle under this chapter except as to special
161 regulations in this part and except as to those provisions of this chapter which by their
162 nature can have no application.
163 40-6-361.
H. B. 308
- 7 -

25 HB 308/AP
164 (a) All low-speed vehicles, miniature on-road vehicles, and multipurpose off-highway
165 vehicles are entitled to full use of a lane, and no motor vehicle shall be driven in such a
166 manner as to deprive any such vehicles of the full use of a lane.
167 (b) The operator of a low-speed vehicle, miniature on-road vehicle, or multipurpose
168 off-highway vehicle shall not overtake and pass in the same lane occupied by the vehicle
169 being overtaken.
170 (c) No person shall operate a low-speed vehicle, miniature on-road vehicle, or
171 multipurpose off-highway vehicle between lanes of traffic or between adjacent lines or
172 rows of vehicles.
173 (d) Low-speed vehicles, miniature on-road vehicles, and multipurpose off-highway
174 vehicles shall not be operated two or more abreast in a single lane.
175 40-6-362.
176 (a) Low-speed vehicles shall be operated only on any highway where the posted speed
177 limit does not exceed 35 miles per hour. The operator of a low-speed vehicle shall not
178 operate such vehicle on any highway where the posted speed limit exceeds 35 miles per
179 hour.
180 (b) Multipurpose off-highway vehicles shall be operated only on highways that are part
181 of a county road system and shall be authorized to cross highways that are part of a
182 municipal street system or are part of the state highway system.
183 (c) Miniature on-road vehicles shall be operated only on highways that are part of a
184 municipal street system or county road system, provided that such operation has not been
185 prohibited through ordinance or resolution within a local jurisdiction, and shall be
186 authorized to cross highways that are part of the state highway system."
H. B. 308
- 8 -

25 HB 308/AP
187 SECTION 9.
188 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-6-371, relating to powers of local authorities
189 generally, by revising paragraphs (18.1) through (20) of and adding a new paragraph to
190 subsection (a) and by revising subsection (c) to read as follows:
191 "(18.1)(19) Regulating the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices,
192 provided that such regulations are no less restrictive than those imposed by Part 2A of
193 Article 13 of this chapter;
194 (18.2)(20) Regulating the operation of personal transportation vehicles, provided that
195 such regulations comply with Parts 3 and 6 of Article 13 of this chapter;
196 (21) Prohibiting the operation of miniature on-road vehicles as authorized in Code
197 Section 40-6-362;
198 (19)(22) Adopting and enforcing such temporary or experimental regulations as may be
199 necessary to cover emergencies or special conditions; or
200 (20)(23) Adopting such other traffic regulations as are specifically authorized by this
201 chapter."
202 "(c) No ordinance or regulation enacted under paragraph (4), (5), (6), (8), (9), (10), (11),
203 (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), or (18.2) (20), or (21) of subsection (a) of this Code
204 section shall be effective until official traffic-control devices giving notice of such local
205 traffic regulations are erected upon or at the entrances to the highway or the part thereof
206 affected as may be most appropriate."
207 SECTION 10.
208 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-6-390.1, relating to reckless stunt driving,
209 by adding a new subsection to read as follows:
210 "(b.1)(1) As used in this subsection, the term 'intelligent speed assistance device' means
211 a device designed to be installed within a motor vehicle to actively monitor and prevent
212 the operator from exceeding a preset speed. Such term shall not include any technology
H. B. 308
- 9 -

25 HB 308/AP
213 provided by the motor vehicle manufacturer as a component of a motor vehicle that
214 controls or affects the speed of a motor vehicle.
215 (2) Upon conviction of a violation of this Code section and in addition to the punishment
216 provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, a court shall be authorized to order
217 the installation of an intelligent speed assistance device upon the motor vehicle operated
218 by the offender during such violation when the offender is the registered owner of such
219 motor vehicle as shown in the records of the Department of Revenue. Such order shall
220 set the maximum speed limit for an intelligent speed assistance device installed upon a
221 motor vehicle at a speed limit of no greater than 20 percent above the posted speed limit.
222 An intelligent speed assistance device shall be installed within ten days of the issuance
223 of such order and remain on the vehicle for a period of time ordered by the court which
224 shall be no less than six months. The costs relating to the installation of an intelligent
225 speed assistance device upon a motor vehicle and any monitoring thereof shall be borne
226 by the offender. Any court which orders an intelligent speed assistance device to be
227 placed upon a motor vehicle pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department of
228 Revenue with a copy of such order. The records of the Department of Revenue shall
229 contain a record reflecting that the motor vehicle shall only be operated when equipped
230 with a functioning intelligent speed assistance device. The operation of a motor vehicle
231 without an intelligent speed assistance device for which an order for installation of an
232 intelligent speed assistance device has been issued pursuant to this subsection by the
233 offender issued such order shall be punished as for a misdemeanor."
234 SECTION 11.
235 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-8-73.1, relating to tinting of windows or
236 windshields of motor vehicles, by revising subsection (h) as follows:
H. B. 308
- 10 -

25 HB 308/AP
237 "(h) Any person who violates subsection (b) or (e) of this Code section shall be guilty of
238 a misdemeanor; provided, however, that no fingerprints shall be obtained for a violation
239 of this Code section."
240 SECTION 12.
241 Said title is further amended in Code Section 40-13-2.1, relating to signature on citations
242 required, effect of failure to sign, exemption for out-of-state drivers, and electronic capture
243 of signature, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
244 "(a) A person who is issued a citation as provided in this chapter or Code Section 17-6-11,
245 relating to display of driver's license in lieu of bail, shall may sign the citation to
246 acknowledge receipt of the citation and of his or her obligation to appear for trial. The
247 officer shall advise the person that signing the citation is not an admission of guilt and that
248 failure to sign will result in the person having to post a cash bond appear for trial. If the
249 person refuses to sign the citation, it shall constitute reasonable cause to believe that the
250 person will not appear at trial and the officer shall write 'Refusal to Sign' on such citation
251 and shall give the citation to such person. The officer may bring the person before a
252 judicial officer or traffic violations bureau to post a bond as is otherwise provided by law."
253 SECTION 13.
254 Code Section 48-5-473 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to returns for
255 taxation and application for and issuance of license plates upon payment of taxes due, is
256 amended by revising subsection (b) as follows:
257 "(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, in the case of an antique or hobby
258 or special interest motor vehicle, as defined in Code Section 48-5-440, or a miniature
259 on-road vehicle, as defined in Code Section 40-1-1, the owner or owners shall certify at the
H. B. 308
- 11 -

25 HB 308/AP
260 time of returning the antique or hobby or special interest motor such vehicle for taxation,
261 paying the taxes due on the motor vehicle, and purchasing a license plate for the motor
262 vehicle or at the time of the first sale or transfer of the motor vehicle that the vehicle is an
263 antique or hobby or special interest motor vehicle or a miniature on-road vehicle as defined
264 in Code Section 48-5-440, and, upon said certification, said vehicle shall be registered and
265 a license plate issued with the imposition of an ad valorem tax based on $100.00 valuation;
266 provided, however, that taxes shall be due at the time of registration or at the time required
267 by law for registration during the owner's registration period as provided in subsection (a)
268 of this Code section."
269 SECTION 14.
270 (a) Except as otherwise provided for in subsection (b) of this section, this Act shall become
271 effective on October 1, 2025.
272 (b) Section 4 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2032.
273 SECTION 15.
274 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 308
- 12 -